test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-sgess_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - sgess: # 7 x contlex sg ess -- inte kontrollerad 
    afäärimies+N+Sg+Ess: afäärimiehenä
    eusmies+N+Sg+Ess: eusmiehenä
    frahtimies+N+Sg+Ess: frahtimiehenä
    hakkomies+N+Sg+Ess: hakkomiehenä
    ikämies+N+Sg+Ess: ikämiehenä
    irtimies+N+Sg+Ess: irtimiehenä
    iskemämies+N+Sg+Ess: iskemämiehenä
    elläin+N+Sg+Ess: elläimenä
    irtain+N+Sg+Ess: irtaimena
    istuin+N+Sg+Ess: istuimena
    jäänhalkein+N+Sg+Ess: jäänhalkeimena
    jäsenyin+N+Sg+Ess: jäsenykimenä
    ahmajäsen+N+Sg+Ess: ahmajäsenenä
    ahven+N+Sg+Ess: ahvenheena
    askel+N+Sg+Ess: askelheena
    höyhen+N+Sg+Ess: höyhenenä
    isosisar+N+Sg+Ess: isosisarena
    jääntanner+N+Sg+Ess: jääntanterheena
    jalkatyär+N+Sg+Ess: jalkatyttärenä
    ahneus+N+Sg+Ess: ahneutena
    falskeus+N+Sg+Ess: falskeutena
    fariseeus+N+Sg+Ess: fariseeutena
    fiineys+N+Sg+Ess: fiineytenä
    fiiniys+N+Sg+Ess: fiiniytenä
    ilfheys+N+Sg+Ess: ilfheytenä
    ilkeys+N+Sg+Ess: ilkeytenä
    jiddisch+N+Sg+Ess: jiddischinnä
    äärheinen+N+Sg+Ess: äärheisennä
    äärheinen+N+Sg+Ess: äärheisenä
    äärheinen+N+Sg+Ess: äärheisennä
    äärheinen+N+Sg+Ess: äärheisenä
    ainukainen+N+Sg+Ess: ainukaisena
    ainukainen+N+Sg+Ess: ainukaisenna
    ainukainen+N+Sg+Ess: ainukaisena
    ainukainen+N+Sg+Ess: ainukaisenna
    ammuminen+N+Sg+Ess: ammumisena
    ammuminen+N+Sg+Ess: ammumisenna
    ammuminen+N+Sg+Ess: ammumisena
    ammuminen+N+Sg+Ess: ammumisenna
    ampiainen+N+Sg+Ess: ampiaisena
    ampiainen+N+Sg+Ess: ampiaisenna
    ampiainen+N+Sg+Ess: ampiaisena
    ampiainen+N+Sg+Ess: ampiaisenna
    ästiitiäinen+N+Sg+Ess: ästiitiäisennä
    ästiitiäinen+N+Sg+Ess: ästiitiäisenä
    äykiäinen+N+Sg+Ess: äykiäisennä
    äykiäinen+N+Sg+Ess: äykiäisenä
    aamuvyö+N+Sg+Ess: aamuvyönä
    äkäpää+N+Sg+Ess: äkäpäänä
    äkkipää+N+Sg+Ess: äkkipäänä
    ärräpää+N+Sg+Ess: ärräpäänä
    asepuu+N+Sg+Ess: asepuuna
    takkaa-ajo+N+Sg+Ess: takkaa-ajona
    a-malmi+N+Sg+Ess: a-malmina
    ääkkä+N+Sg+Ess: ääkkänä
    aalto+N+Sg+Ess: aaltona
    abortti+N+Sg+Ess: aborttina
    aho+N+Sg+Ess: ahona
    äijäfaari+N+Sg+Ess: äijäfaarina
    aihe+N+Sg+Ess: aihheena
    äile+N+Sg+Ess: äilheenä
    aine+N+Sg+Ess: ainheena
    alote+N+Sg+Ess: alotheena
    alue+N+Sg+Ess: aluheena
    akleija+N+Sg+Ess: akleijanna
    äkseerinki+N+Sg+Ess: äkseerinkinä
    almunakka+N+Sg+Ess: almunakkana
    alttari+N+Sg+Ess: alttarinna
    ämmäkkö+N+Sg+Ess: ämmäkkönnä
    ammunta+N+Sg+Ess: ammuntanna
    ääri+N+Sg+Ess: äärenä
    äitiväki+N+Sg+Ess: äitiväkenä
    ehontähti+N+Sg+Ess: ehontähtenä
    ehtotähti+N+Sg+Ess: ehtotähtenä
    elämänonni+N+Sg+Ess: elämänonnena
    epiteemi+N+Sg+Ess: epiteemenä
    äitinkieli+N+Sg+Ess: äitinkielenä
    äitipuoli+N+Sg+Ess: äitipuolena
    asuntolohi+N+Sg+Ess: asuntolohena
    hiili+N+Sg+Ess: hiilenä
    aikakausi+N+Sg+Ess: aikakautena
    färivesi+N+Sg+Ess: färivetenä
    hangonvarsi+N+Sg+Ess: hangonvartena
    hirsi+N+Sg+Ess: hirtenä
    ikävuosi+N+Sg+Ess: [ikävuotena, ikävuona]
    ilovesi+N+Sg+Ess: ilovetenä
    imulapsi+N+Sg+Ess: imulapsena
    irtilapsi+N+Sg+Ess: irtilapsena
    jalkalapsi+N+Sg+Ess: jalkalapsena
    jumalallapsi+N+Sg+Ess: jumalallapsena
    kapalolapsi+N+Sg+Ess: kapalolapsena
    kasvattilapsi+N+Sg+Ess: kasvattilapsena
    kusilapsi+N+Sg+Ess: kusilapsena
    höttölumi+N+Sg+Ess: höttölumena
    iloliemi+N+Sg+Ess: iloliemenä
    kalanliemi+N+Sg+Ess: kalanliemenä
    kankhaanloimi+N+Sg+Ess: kankhaanloimena
    lähetystoimi+N+Sg+Ess: lähetystoimena
    liemi+N+Sg+Ess: liemenä
    auttavaisuus+N+Sg+Ess: auttavaisuutena
    hankaluus+N+Sg+Ess: hankaluutena
    hiljaisuus+N+Sg+Ess: hiljaisuutena
    huoruus+N+Sg+Ess: huoruutena
    iänkaikkisuus+N+Sg+Ess: iänkaikkisuutena
    itusuus+N+Sg+Ess: itusuutena
    jatkuvuus+N+Sg+Ess: jatkuvuutena
    raja-asukas+N+Sg+Ess: raja-asukhaana
    aijas+N+Sg+Ess: aijhaana
    ankerias+N+Sg+Ess: ankerihaana
    apilas+N+Sg+Ess: apilhaana
    asukas+N+Sg+Ess: asukhaana
    ehokas+N+Sg+Ess: ehokhaana
    evankeeljum+N+Sg+Ess: evankeeljumina
    Antinpäivä+N+Sg+Ess: Antinpäivänä
    Kruunu+N+Sg+Ess: Kruununa
    Kyriiri+N+Sg+Ess: Kyriirinä
    Laurina+N+Sg+Ess: Laurinana
    Mikkelinpäivä+N+Sg+Ess: Mikkelinpäivänä
    Norrlänska+N+Sg+Ess: Norrlänskana
    TV-masti+N+Sg+Ess: TV-mastina
    äänensävy+N+Sg+Ess: äänensävynä
    alunastifti+N+Sg+Ess: alunastiftinä
    romani chib+N+Sg+Ess: romani chibinä
